Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.500

Impersonation of director or sealer—Penalty.

Any person who impersonates in any way the director or a city sealer, by using an official seal of approval without specific authorization to do so or by using a counterfeit seal of approval, or in any other manner, is subject to a civil penalty of no more than five thousand dollars per occurrence.

[ 2019 c 96 s 16; 1992 c 237 s 33; 1969 c 67 s 50.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 96: See note following RCW 19.94.160.